Washington statutes.
RCW 6.28.030

Effect of conveyance pursuant to judgment.

A conveyance made in pursuance of a judgment shall pass to the grantee the title of the parties ordered to convey the land.

[Code 1881 s 530; 1877 p 112 s 534; 1854 p 205 s 392; RRS s 607.]